Hawaii statutes.
B. [Teacher Education: College]

[§304A-1201] College of education. The
college of education shall be affiliated with the university and shall be under
the jurisdiction and management of the board of regents. The board may grant
appropriate degrees to properly qualified graduates of the college of
education. In establishing the curriculum for the college of education, the
university authorities may obtain the approval of the Hawaii teacher standards
board. The mission of the college of education is to:

(1) Prepare and provide ongoing professional
development of teachers, administrators, counselors, and related professionals
at undergraduate and graduate levels primarily to meet the needs of Hawaii
schools;

(2) Generate, synthesize, and apply knowledge in
education and related fields through teaching, research, and other scholarly
activities; and

(3) Provide service and support to the local,
national, and global educational and related communities. [L 2006, c 75, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next